Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.305

Permanent supportive housing—Code city may not prohibit where multifamily housing is permitted.

A code city may not prohibit permanent supportive housing in areas where multifamily housing is permitted.

[ 2019 c 348 s 10.]